Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,172
Confidential information; disclosure prohibited; exception.

Any data or information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment, or health of any enrollee or applicant obtained from such person or from any provider by any health maintenance organization shall be held in confidence and shall not be disclosed to any person except (1) to the extent that it may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the Health Maintenance Organization Act, (2) upon the express consent of the enrollee or applicant, (3) pursuant to statute or court order for the production of evidence or the discovery thereof, or (4) in the event of a claim or litigation between such person and the health maintenance organization in which such data or information is pertinent. A health maintenance organization shall be entitled to claim any statutory privileges against such disclosure which the provider who furnished such information to the health maintenance organization is entitled to claim.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 81.